Utah statutes.
58-55-305.   Exemptions from licensure.
(1)  In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, the
following persons may engage in acts or practices included within the practice
of construction trades, subject to the stated circumstances and limitations,
without being licensed under this chapter:
(a)  an authorized representative of the United States government or an
authorized employee of the state or any of its political subdivisions when
working on construction work of the state or the subdivision, and when acting
within the terms of the person's trust, office, or employment;
(b)  a person engaged in construction or operation incidental to the
construction and repair of irrigation and drainage ditches of regularly
constituted irrigation districts, reclamation districts, and drainage
districts or construction and repair relating to farming, dairying,
agriculture, livestock or poultry raising, metal and coal mining, quarries,
sand and gravel excavations, well drilling, as defined in Section 73-3-25,
hauling to and from construction sites, and lumbering;
(c)  public utilities operating under the rules of the Public Service
Commission on work incidental to their own business;
(d)  sole owners of property engaged in building:
(i)  no more than one residential structure per year and no more than three
residential structures per five years on their property for their own
noncommercial, nonpublic use; except, a person other than the property owner
or individuals described in Subsection (1)(e), who engages in building the
structure must be licensed under this chapter if the person is otherwise
required to be licensed under this chapter; or
(ii)  structures on their property for their own noncommercial, nonpublic use
which are incidental to a residential structure on the property, including
sheds, carports, or detached garages;
(e) (i)  a person engaged in construction or renovation of a residential
building for noncommercial, nonpublic use if that person:
(A)  works without compensation other than token compensation that is not
considered salary or wages; and
(B)  works under the direction of the property owner who engages in building
the structure; and
(ii)  as used in this Subsection (1)(e), "token compensation" means
compensation paid by a sole owner of property exempted from licensure under
Subsection (1)(d) to a person exempted from licensure under this Subsection
(1)(e), that is:
(A)  minimal in value when compared with the fair market value of the services
provided by the person;
(B)  not related to the fair market value of the services provided by the
person; and
(C)  is incidental to the providing of services by the person including paying
for or providing meals or refreshment while services are being provided, or
paying reasonable transportation costs incurred by the person in travel to the
site of construction;
(f)  a person engaged in the sale or merchandising of personal property that
by its design or manufacture may be attached, installed, or otherwise affixed
to real property who has contracted with a person, firm, or corporation
licensed under this chapter to install, affix, or attach that property;
(g)  a contractor submitting a bid on a federal aid highway project, if,
before undertaking construction under that bid, the contractor is licensed
under this chapter;
(h) (i)  a person engaged in the alteration, repair, remodeling, or addition
to or improvement of a building with a contracted or agreed value of less than
$3,000, including both labor and materials, and including all changes or
additions to the contracted or agreed upon work; and
(ii)  notwithstanding Subsection (1)(h)(i) and except as otherwise provided in
this section:
(A)  work in the plumbing and electrical trades on a Subsection (1)(h)(i)
project within any six month period of time:
(I)  must be performed by a licensed electrical or plumbing contractor, if the
project involves an electrical or plumbing system; and
(II)  may be performed by a licensed journeyman electrician or plumber or an
individual referred to in Subsection (1)(h)(ii)(A)(I), if the project involves
a component of the system such as a faucet, toilet, fixture, device, outlet,
or electrical switch;
(B)  installation, repair, or replacement of a residential or commercial gas
appliance or a combustion system on a Subsection (1)(h)(i) project must be
performed by a person who has received certification under Subsection
58-55-308(2) except as otherwise provided in Subsection 58-55-308(2)(d) or
58-55-308(3);
(C)  installation, repair, or replacement of water-based fire protection
systems on a Subsection (1)(h)(i) project must be performed by a licensed fire
suppression systems contractor or a licensed journeyman plumber;
(D)  work as an alarm business or company or as an alarm company agent shall
be performed by a licensed alarm business or company or a licensed alarm
company agent, except as otherwise provided in this chapter;
(E)  installation, repair, or replacement of an alarm system on a Subsection
(1)(h)(i) project must be performed by a licensed alarm business or company or
a licensed alarm company agent;
(F)  installation, repair, or replacement of a heating, ventilation, or air
conditioning system (HVAC) on a Subsection (1)(h)(i) project must be performed
by an HVAC contractor licensed by the division;
(G)  installation, repair, or replacement of a radon mitigation system or a
soil depressurization system must be performed by a licensed contractor; and
(H)  if the total value of the project is greater than $1,000, the person
shall file with the division a one-time affirmation, subject to periodic
reaffirmation as established by division rule, that the person has:
(I)  public liability insurance in coverage amounts and form established by
division rule; and
(II)  if applicable, workers compensation insurance which would cover an
employee of the person if that employee worked on the construction project;
(i)  a person practicing a specialty contractor classification or construction
trade which the director does not classify by administrative rule as
significantly impacting the public's health, safety, and welfare;
(j)  owners and lessees of property and persons regularly employed for wages
by owners or lessees of property or their agents for the purpose of
maintaining the property, are exempt from this chapter when doing work upon
the property;
(k) (i)  a person engaged in minor plumbing work that is incidental, as
defined by the division by rule, to the replacement or repair of a fixture or
an appliance in a residential or small commercial building, or structure used
for agricultural use, as defined in Section 58-56-3, provided that no
modification is made to:
(A)  existing culinary water, soil, waste, or vent piping; or
(B)  a gas appliance or combustion system; and
(ii)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(e), installation for the first time
of a fixture or an appliance is not included in the exemption provided under
Subsection (1)(k)(i);
(l)  a person who ordinarily would be subject to the plumber licensure
requirements under this chapter when installing or repairing a water
conditioner or other water treatment apparatus if the conditioner or
apparatus:
(i)  meets the appropriate state construction codes or local plumbing
standards; and
(ii)  is installed or repaired under the direction of a person authorized to
do the work under an appropriate specialty contractor license;
(m)  a person who ordinarily would be subject to the electrician licensure
requirements under this chapter when employed by:
(i)  railroad corporations, telephone corporations or their corporate
affiliates, elevator contractors or constructors, or street railway systems;
or
(ii)  public service corporations, rural electrification associations, or
municipal utilities who generate, distribute, or sell electrical energy for
light, heat, or power;
(n)  a person involved in minor electrical work incidental to a mechanical or
service installation;
(o)  a student participating in construction trade education and training
programs approved by the commission with the concurrence of the director under
the condition that:
(i)  all work intended as a part of a finished product on which there would
normally be an inspection by a building inspector is, in fact, inspected and
found acceptable by a licensed building inspector; and
(ii)  a licensed contractor obtains the necessary building permits;
(p)  a delivery person when replacing any of the following existing equipment
with a new gas appliance, provided there is an existing gas shutoff valve at
the appliance:
(i)  gas range;
(ii)  gas dryer;
(iii)  outdoor gas barbeque; or
(iv)  outdoor gas patio heater;
(q)  a person performing maintenance on an elevator as defined in Subsection
58-55-102(14), if the maintenance is not related to the operating integrity of
the elevator; and
(r)  an apprentice or helper of an elevator mechanic licensed under this
chapter when working under the general direction of the licensed elevator
mechanic.
(2)  A compliance agency as defined in Section 58-56-3 that issues a building
permit to a person requesting a permit as a sole owner of property referred to
in Subsection (1)(d) shall notify the division, in writing or through
electronic transmission, of the issuance of the permit.
